Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Penalties

198B.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of KRS 198B.140, 198B.6671, or 198B.6672, the Uniform State Building Code, the Uniform State Residential Code, or any directive or order issued pursuant thereto, shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). Each day the violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who violates the provisions of KRS 198B.310 to 198B.330 shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or be imprisoned for not more than one (1) year, or both.

Any person who violates any provision of KRS 198B.410 to 198B.540, or regulation issued thereunder, shall be fined a sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense.

Any person who violates any provision of KRS 198B.550 to 198B.630 or 198B.6401 to 198B.6417 shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). Each day the violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.

History.
Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 117, § 65, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 9, effective July 15, 1980; 2007, ch. 86, § 10, effective July 1, 2008; 2012, ch. 104, § 3, effective January 1, 2013.

198B.991.
Penalty.

Failure to comply with any order under KRS 198B.625 or the violation of KRS 198B.550 to 198B.630 or any regulation issued thereunder shall constitute a Class B misdemeanor.

History.
Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 383, § 18, effective July 13, 1984.